Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1710
Foreign support order, defined.

Foreign support order shall mean a support order issued by a court or agency of another jurisdiction.

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 30.